Hawaii statutes.
§674-11 Subsequent litigation; excluded
evidence. No statement made in the course of any investigation,
hearing, or review proceedings of the panel shall be admissible in
evidence either as an admission, to impeach the credibility of a witness, or
for any other purpose in any legal proceeding. No opinion, conclusion,
finding, or recommendation of the panel on the issue of liability, or on the
issue of compensation, or corrective action shall be admitted into evidence in
any legal proceeding, nor shall any party to the panel hearing, or the counsel,
or other representative of the party, refer to or comment thereon in any
opening statement, any argument, or at any other time, to any court or jury. [L
1991, c 323, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 351, §8]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next